Utah statutes.
75-3-906.   Distribution in kind -- Valuation -- Method.
(1) Unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will, the distributable
assets of a decedent's estate shall be distributed in kind to the extent
possible through application of the following provisions:
(a)  A specific devisee is entitled to distribution of the thing devised to
him, and a spouse or child who has selected particular assets of an estate as
provided in Section 75-2-403 shall receive the items selected.
(b)  Any homestead or family allowance or devise payable in money may be
satisfied by value in kind provided:
(i)  the person entitled to the payment has not demanded payment in cash;
(ii)  the property distributed in kind is valued at fair market value as of
the date of its distribution; and
(iii)  no residuary devisee has requested that the asset in question remain a
part of the residue of the estate.
(c)  For the purpose of valuation under Subsection (1)(b) above, securities
regularly traded on recognized exchanges, if distributed in kind, are valued
at the price for the last sale of like securities traded on the business day
prior to distribution, or if there was no sale on that day, at the median
between amounts bid and offered at the close of that day. Assets consisting of
sums owed the decedent or the estate by solvent debtors as to which there is
no known dispute or defense are valued at the sum due with accrued interest or
discounted to the date of distribution. For assets which do not have readily
ascertainable values, a valuation as of a date not more than 30 days prior to
the date of distribution, if otherwise reasonable, controls. For purposes of
facilitating distribution, the personal representative may ascertain the value
of the assets as of the time of the proposed distribution in any reasonable
way, including the employment of qualified appraisers, even if the assets may
have been previously appraised.
(d)  The residuary estate shall be distributed in kind if there is no
objection to the proposed distribution and it is practicable to distribute
undivided interests. In other cases, residuary property may be converted into
cash for distribution.
(2)  After the probable charges against the estate are known, the personal
representative may mail or deliver a proposal for distribution to all persons
who have a right to object to the proposed distribution. The right of any
distributee to object to the proposed distribution on the basis of the kind or
value of asset he is to receive, if not waived earlier in writing, terminates
if he fails to object in writing received by the personal representative
within 30 days after mailing or delivery of the proposal.
